Illinois, session 104th, HB5174.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Human 5Services Equitable Pay Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 7        (1) Research from Illinois Partners for Human Service 8    found that, among 850 surveyed human service professionals 9    in the State, 82% of respondents do not make a living wage, 10    exacerbating the racial wealth gap in Illinois. 11        (2) Employees of community-based human services 12    providers face significant recruitment and retention 13    issues due to this low pay and because these roles often do 14    not see the same level of robust benefits packages and 15    guaranteed salary steps provided to employees at State 16    agencies who do similar work and have similar titles. 17        (3) When it comes to closing the pay gap caused by 18    stagnant State contracts, insufficient research in 19    compensation in the human service sector, paired with a 20    lack of shared leadership and advisement from leaders at 21    community-based organizations, has led to the erasure of 22    more than 350,000 workers in the sector and the millions 23    of people they provide services to.   HB5174- 2 -LRB104 18361 RPS 31801 b1        (4) It is the responsibility of State government to 2    ensure the sustainability of the human services workforce 3    and equitable pay in the field, which encourages the flow 4    of opportunities for gainful employment and retention 5    among human service organizations. 6    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "BIPOC" means an individual who self-reports a racial or 8ethnic identity as Black/African American, Indigenous, or 9person of color. 10    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 11    "Human services provider" means a nonprofit organization 12with a human services program funded by the Department that 13primarily operates for the purposes of providing direct or 14indirect services in the area or areas of child care and early 15education services, community-integrated living arrangements, 16domestic violence prevention and recovery, foster care 17services, health care and wellness services, homeless and 18supportive housing services, immigrant supportive services, 19intellectual/developmental disability services, mobile crisis 20response, older adult services, workforce development, youth 21services, and mental, behavioral health, and substance use 22services. "Human services provider" includes any nonprofit 23organization that provides services that ensure individuals 24have the essential elements to build and maintain physical, 25emotional, and economic well-being at every phase of life, as   HB5174- 3 -LRB104 18361 RPS 31801 b1indicated by providing examples of current or completed 2successful programs that satisfy this definition. "Human 3services provider" does not include colleges and universities, 4local government agencies, correctional centers and county 5jails, non-safety-net hospitals, State police or municipal 6police departments, or any public or private preschools, 7elementary schools, or high schools. 8    "Professional" means an individual employed by a human 9services organization that contracts with, is grant-funded, or 10receives funding from the Department for the purposes of 11providing direct or indirect services that ensure that 12individuals have the essential elements to build and maintain 13physical, emotional, and economic well-being at every phase of 14life. 15    "Rate" means the reimbursement rate paid by the Department 16to a human services provider to deliver services to clients on 17the State's behalf. 18    Section 15. Human Services Equitable Pay Task Force. 19    (a) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department of 20Human Services shall establish the Human Services Equitable 21Pay Task Force. 22        (1) Members of the Task Force shall be appointed by 23    the Governor and shall consist of the following members: 24            (A) Two representatives of the Department of Human 25        Services.   HB5174- 4 -LRB104 18361 RPS 31801 b1            (B) One representative of a statewide organization 2        representing cross-sector human services providers. 3            (C) Two representatives of statewide organizations 4        representing human services providers. 5            (D) One representative of a human services 6        provider based in a rural area in Illinois. 7            (E) Two representatives of human services 8        providers that have annual budgets of $10,000,000 or 9        higher. 10            (F) Two representatives of human services 11        providers that have annual budgets under $10,000,000. 12            (G) One representative of a trade or labor union 13        representing professionals employed by human services 14        providers. 15            (H) Two human service professionals. 16        (2) At least 3 members of the Task Force appointed 17    from items (A) through (F) of paragraph (1) must be BIPOC 18    Executive Directors of community-based human service 19    organizations. 20        (3) The Task Force shall have 2 co-chairs, one from 21    item (A) of paragraph (1) and one from items (B) through 22    (F) of paragraph (1). 23    (b) The Task Force shall be voluntarily staffed by an 24external entity. 25    (c) The Department shall provide administrative and other 26support to the Task Force.   HB5174- 5 -LRB104 18361 RPS 31801 b1    Section 20. Responsibilities. 2    (a) The Task Force shall publish a report no later than 3December 1, 2027, and every 2 years thereafter, that studies 4various issues relating to recruitment, retention, and wage 5inequity within the human services sector in Illinois. The 6Task Force shall examine, among any other issues it chooses to 7investigate with respect to human services, the following 8issues: 9        (1) grant levels and reimbursement rate levels that 10    human services providers have received since Fiscal Year 11    2021; 12        (2) patterns in entry-level wages and wage growth 13    among community-based providers and State agencies; 14        (3) existing State resources and programs that assist 15    in the development of a strong pipeline of workers for 16    human service positions; and 17        (4) funding interventions needed to support the 18    findings generated from the Task Force. 19    (b) The Task Force shall receive the assistance of 20legislative staff and may employ skilled experts and shall 21report its findings to the General Assembly and the Governor's 22Office of Management and Budget. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.